New York, session 2025-2026, A1671.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 805 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 805. Anti-gun violence education. 1. All schools shall include age- 4 appropriate instruction on anti-gun violence as an integral part of the 5 education provided by regular classroom teachers. 6 2. The commissioner shall prescribe such rules and regulations regard- 7 ing instruction on anti-gun violence as the commissioner may deem neces- 8 sary and desirable for the health and welfare of pupils and the communi- 9 ty. The contents may be varied to meet the needs of particular school 10 districts, or portions thereof, and need not be uniform throughout the 11 state, provided, however, that school districts shall utilize either the 12 curriculum for anti-gun violence instruction prescribed by the commis- 13 sioner or a course approved by the commissioner in accordance with 14 criteria established by the commissioner. 15 3. School authorities shall provide the needed facilities, time and 16 place for the instruction set forth in this section and shall provide 17 learning aids and curriculum resource materials which contribute to 18 effective teaching methods and learning in anti-gun violence. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of July next succeeding 20 the date upon which it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, 21 the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation neces- 22 sary for the implementation of this act on its effective date are 23 authorized to be made on or before such date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04255-01-5